Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.100

Termination of entity—Pending business—Savings. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

This chapter shall not affect the right to institute or prosecute any cause of action by or against an entity terminated pursuant to this chapter if the cause of action arose prior to the end of the period provided in RCW 43.131.090. Such causes of action may be instituted, prosecuted, or defended in the name of the state of Washington by the office of the attorney general. Any hearing or other proceeding pending before an entity to be terminated and not completed before the end of the period provided in RCW 43.131.090, may be completed by the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity.

[ 2000 c 189 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 10.]